Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of One


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or so much thereof as may be


necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Department


of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry by law.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 1922 Page 1


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1922 JC 3/31/2025 10:11:19 AM









































Req. No. 1922 Page 2